cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Autoalarmy a zámky pro automobily: Příslušenství k autoalarmům; Autoalarmy; Autoalarmy a zámky pro motocykly; Autozámky a jejich součásti; Zámky závěsných zařízení vozidel; Imobilizéry; Dálkové bezklíčové systémy; Zámky volantů; Botičky
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 交通工具警报器与锁: 汽车警报器配件; 汽车警报系统; 摩托车警报器/锁; 车辆门锁和零部件; 车钩锁; 汽车防盗止动器; 汽车遥控无匙系统; 汽车方向盘锁; 汽车止退器/三角木
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Alarmi in ključavnice za vozila: Dodatki za avtomobilske alarme; Avtomobilski alarmni sistemi; Alarmi in ključavnice za motorna kolesa; Ključavnice in deli za zaklepanje vrat vozila; Zaklepi za vlečne kljuke; Zaščita vozila pred krajo; Sistemi za oddaljeno odklepanje vozila; Varovala za volanski obroč; Objemke za kolesa vozil
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Fechos e alarmes para veículos: Acessórios de alarmes para automóveis; Sistemas de alarme para automóveis; Fechos e alarmes para motas; Peças e fechos de portas para veículos; Fechos de reboque para veículos; Imobilizadores para veículos; Sistemas remotos sem chave para veículos; Bloqueios de volante para veículos; Grampos de rodas para veículos
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Kjøretøyalarmer og -låser: Tilbehør til bilalarmer; Bilalarmsystemer; Motorsykkelalarmer og -låser; Bildørlåser og -deler; Hengerfestelåser til biler; Startsperrer til bil; Nøkkelfri startsystemer for bil; Rattlåser til bil; Hjullåser til bil
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Συναγερμοί & κλειδαριές οχημάτων: Αξεσουάρ συναγερμών αυτοκινήτων; Συστήματα συναγερμού αυτοκινήτων; Συναγερμοί & κλειδαριές μοτοσικλετών; Κλειδαριές θυρών & εξαρτήματα οχημάτων; Κλειδαριές κοτσαδόρων οχημάτων; Αντικλεπτικά συστήματα οχημάτων; Συστήματα τηλεχειρισμού χωρίς κλειδί; Κλειδαριές τιμονιού οχημάτων; Σφιγκτήρες τροχών οχημάτων
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Alarme și antifurturi pentru vehicule: Accesorii alarme auto; Sisteme de alarmă auto; Alarme și antifurturi pentru motociclete; Încuietori și piese pentru uși auto; Încuietori auto cu cuplaj; Imobilizatoare pentru vehicule; Sisteme fără cheie de la distanță pentru vehicule; Sisteme de blocare volan vehicul; Cleme volan vehicul
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Alarmes e travas para veículos: Acessórios para alarmes automotivos; Sistemas de alarmes automotivos; Alarmes e travas para motocicleta; Travas e peças de travas para portas de veículos; Travas para engate de reboque; Imobilizadores para veículos; Sistemas de entrada sem chave para veículos; Travas de volante para veículos; Travas de rodas automotivas
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Сигнализации и замки для транспортных средств: Аксессуары для автомобильной сигнализации; Автомобильные системы сигнализации; Сигнализации и замки для мотоциклов; Дверные замки для транспортных средств и их детали; Замки для сцепных устройств транспортных средств; Блокирующие противоугонные устройства для транспортных средств; Системы для дистанционного отпирания дверей; Замки рулевого механизма для транспортных средств; Блокираторы колес для транспортных средств
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Chuông báo trộm & khóa xe: Phụ kiện báo động trên ô tô; Hệ thống báo động trên xe; Thiết bị báo động và khóa cho xe mô tô; Khóa cửa và phụ tùng xe; Khóa chống trộm; Thiết bị chống khởi động động cơ; Các hệ thống điều khiển xe từ xa không khóa; Dụng cụ khóa vô lăng và bánh xe; Thiết bị chặn bánh xe
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Alarmen en vergrendelingen voor voertuigen: Alarmaccessoires voor auto's; Alarmsystemen voor auto's; Motoralarmen en -sloten; Deurvergrendelingen voor motorvoertuigen; Trekhaakvergrendelingen voor voertuigen; Startonderbrekers voor voertuigen; Op afstand bedienbare centrale portiervergrendeling voor voertuigen; Stuursloten voor voertuigen; Wielklemmen voor voertuigen
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Araç Alarmları ve Kilitleri: Otomotiv Alarm Aksesuarları; Otomotiv Alarm Sistemleri; Motosiklet Alarmları ve Kilitleri; Motorlu Taşıt Kapı Kilitleri; Taşıt Asma Kilitleri; Motor Kilitleri; Araç Uzaktan Kumandalı Anahtarsız Sistemler; Direksiyon Kilitleri; Araç Tekerlek Kilitleri
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Járműriasztók és -zárak: Autóriasztó-kiegészítők; Autós riasztórendszerek; Motorkerékpár-riasztók és -zárak; Járműajtózárak és -alkatrészek; Járművonózárak; Jármű-indításgátlók; Jármű-távirányító kulcs nélküli rendszerek; Járműkormánykerék-zárak; Járműkerékbilincsek
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Sikkerheds- og låsesystemer til motorkøretøjer: Tilbehør til alarmsystemer i motorkøretøjer; Alarmsystemer til motorkøretøjer; Alarmer og låse til motorcykler; Dørlåse til køretøjer; Låse til anhængertræk; Startspærrer til motorkøretøjer; Fjernbetjente nøgleløse systemer til motorkøretøjer; Ratlåse til motorkøretøjer; Hjullåse til motorkøretøjer
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Säkerhets- och låssystem för fordon: Tillbehör till billarm; Billarmsystem; Lås och larm för motorcyklar; Dörrlås och dörrlåstillbehör för fordon; Dragkrokslås; Startspärrar; Nyckellösa fjärrlåssystem; Rattlås; Hjullås för fordon
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > 乗り物用アラーム・ロックシステム: カーアラーム関連用品; カーアラームシステム; バイク用アラーム・ロック; 乗り物用ドアロック・関連パーツ; ヒッチメンバー用ロック; イモビライザー; リモートキーレスエントリーシステム; ステアリングホイールロック; ホイール クランプ
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Vehicle Alarms & Locks: Automotive Alarm Accessories; Automotive Alarm Systems; Motorcycle Alarms & Locks; Vehicle Door Locks & Parts; Vehicle Hitch Locks; Vehicle Immobilizers; Vehicle Remote Keyless Systems; Vehicle Steering Wheel Locks; Vehicle Wheel Clamps
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Autoalarmy a zámky: Príslušenstvo pre automobilové alarmy; Automobilové poplašné systémy; Alarmy a zámky motocyklov; Zámky a diely dverí vozidiel; Zámky ťažného zariadenia vozidla; Imobilizéry vozidiel; Diaľkové bezkľúčové systémy vozidla; Zámky volantu vozidla; Svorky kolies vozidla
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Auto-Alarmanlagen & Schließsysteme: Zubehör für Auto-Alarmanlagen; Auto-Alarmanlagen; Motorrad-Schlösser & -Alarmanlagen; Kfz-Türschlösser; Kupplungsschlösser; Wegfahrsperren; Fernbediente schlüssellose Systeme; Lenkradschlösser; Radkrallen
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Transporto priemonių signalizacijos ir užraktai: Automobilių signalizacijos priedai; Automobilių signalizacijos sistemos; Motociklų signalizacijos ir užraktai; Transporto priemonių durelių spynelės ir dalys; Transporto priemonių priekabų užraktai; Transporto priemonių imobilizatoriai; Nuotolinės beraktės transporto priemonių sistemos; Transporto priemonių vairo užraktai; Transporto priemonių ratų gnybtai
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Аларми и ключалки за превозни средства: Аксесоари за автомобилни аларми; Автомобилни алармени системи; Аларми и ключалки за мотоциклети; Ключалки и части за врати на превозни средства; Ключалки за тегличи на превозни средства; Имобилайзери за превозни средства; Дистанционни системи за безключов достъп за превозни средства; Заключващи механизми за волан на превозни средства; Скоби за колела на превозни средства
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > สัญญาณกันขโมยและล็อกสำหรับรถยนต์: อุปกรณ์สัญญาณกันขโมยสำหรับรถยนต์; ระบบป้องกันขโมยสำหรับรถยนต์; สัญญาณกันขโมยและล็อคสำหรับมอเตอร์ไซต์; อะไหล่และกลอนประตูรถยนต์; ล็อกคานลากพ่วงสำหรับรถยนต์; อิมโมบิไลเซอร์กุญแจรถ; ระบบรีโมทแบบไม่มีกุญแจของรถยนต์; ล็อกพวงมาลัย; ล็อกล้อรถยนต์
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Auton hälyttimet ja lukot: Auton hälytintarvikkeet; Auton hälytysjärjestelmät; Moottoripyörän hälyttimet ja lukot; Ajoneuvon oven lukot ja osat; Vetokytkimen lukot; Auton ajonestolaitteet; Auton avaimettomat lukitusjärjestelmät; Ajoneuvon rattilukot; Auton rengaslukot
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Systèmes d'alarme et de verrouillage de véhicule: Accessoires pour alarme auto; Systèmes d'alarmes auto; Alarmes et antivols moto; Serrures pour véhicules motorisés; Verrouillage d’attelages; Systèmes antidémarrage de véhicule; Systèmes de verrouillage à distance de véhicule; Antivol bloque-volant; Sabots de Denver
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Sistemi di blocco per veicoli: Accessori per allarmi auto; Sistemi antifurto per auto; Allarmi e lucchetti per moto; Serrature e parti per portiere di veicoli; Sicure per ganci traino per veicoli; Immobilizzatori per veicoli; Impianti telecomandati senza chiave; Bloccasterzo; Morsetti per ruote di veicoli
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Sistemas de alarmas y bloqueo: Accesorios para alarma; Sistemas de alarmas; Alarmas y candados para motocicletas; Cierres y piezas para puertas de vehículos; Cierres para enganches de remolques de vehículos; Inmovilizadores para vehículos; Sistemas remotos de apertura de vehículos; Bloqueos para volantes de vehículos; Cepos para coches
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 汽車警報器/防盜鎖: 汽車警報器配件; 自動警報系統; 機車防盜鎖; 車門鎖與零件; 車輛拖車鎖; 車輛發動機防盜鎖止系統; 汽車遙控免鑰匙系統; 車輛方向盤鎖; 車輪固定夾
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Alarmi i brave za vozila: Dodaci za automobilske alarme; Automobilski alarmni sustavi; Alarmi i brave za motocikle; Brave i dijelovi za vrata vozila; Brave za kuku vozila; Imobilizatori za vozila; Daljinski sustavi bez ključa za vozila; Zaključavanje upravljača za vozila; Stezaljke za kotače vozila
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 자동차 경보/잠금 장치: 자동차 알람 부대용품; 차량 경보 시스템; 오토바이 알람/자물쇠; 차량 도어 로크/부품; 차량 히치 잠금 장치; 차량 도난 방지 장치; 차량 스마트키 시스템; 차량 핸들 잠금 장치; 차량 바퀴 죔쇠
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Alarmy i zamki samochodowe: Akcesoria do alarmów samochodowych; Alarmy samochodowe; Alarmy i blokady motocyklowe; Zamki do drzwi samochodowych i ich elementy; Zamki do haków samochodowych; Immobilisery; Systemy dostępu zdalnego do pojazdów; Blokady kierownicy; Blokady kół samochodowych